Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4427.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 10a. (1) If a health officer or the health officer's designee determines that any of the waters in a county in which the health officer has jurisdiction contain a dangerous level of E. coli due to a discharge of sewage from a combined sewer overflow event or a sanitary sewer overflow event, that health officer or the health officer's designee must, as soon as practicable, but not later than 12 hours after making the determination, notify the emergency management coordinator of that county. Upon receiving notice under this subsection, the emergency management coordinator of that county must issue a brown alert as soon as possible, but not later than 12 hours after receiving notice, to the residents of that county. The brown alert must include, but is not limited to, all of the following information: (a) The location of the contamination. (b) The health risks of exposure to the contamination. (2) As used in this section: (a) "Brown alert" means an emergency alert through the Wireless Emergency Alerts system concerning a dangerous level of E. coli in any of the waters of the county. (b) "Dangerous level of E. coli" means an amount of E. coli in excess of 300 E. coli per 100 milliliters. (c) "Health officer" means the individual in charge of either of the following: (i) A county health department. (ii) A health department that represents multiple counties.